Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.400

Landscape or right-of-way applications—Notice.

(1)(a) A certified applicator making a landscape application shall display the name and telephone number of the applicator or the applicator's employer on any power application apparatus. The applicator shall also carry the material safety data sheet for each pesticide being applied.

(b) A certified applicator making a right-of-way application shall display the name and telephone number of the applicator or the applicator's employer and the words "VEGETATION MANAGEMENT APPLICATION" on any power application apparatus. The applicator shall also carry the material safety data sheet for each pesticide being applied.

(2) If a certified applicator receives a written request for information on a landscape or right-of-way spray application, the applicator shall provide the requestor with the name or names of each pesticide applied and (a) a copy of the material safety data sheet for each pesticide; or (b) a pesticide fact sheet for each pesticide as developed or approved by the department.

(3) The director shall adopt rules establishing the size and lettering requirements of the apparatus display signs required under this section.

[ 1994 c 283 s 32; 1992 c 176 s 2.]